Utah statutes.
22-3-406.   Receipts not normally apportioned -- Obligation to pay money.
(1)  An amount received as interest, whether determined at a fixed, variable,
or floating rate, on an obligation to pay money to the trustee, including an
amount received as consideration for prepaying principal, must be allocated to
income without any provision for amortization of premium.
(2)  A trustee shall allocate to principal an amount received from the sale,
redemption, or other disposition of an obligation to pay money to the trustee
more than one year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, including
an obligation whose purchase price or value when it is acquired is less than
its value at maturity.  If the obligation matures within one year after it is
purchased or acquired by the trustee, an amount received in excess of its
purchase price or its value when acquired by the trust must be allocated to
income.
(3)  This section does not apply to an obligation to which Section 22-3-409,
22-3-410, 22-3-411, 22-3-412, 22-3-414, or 22-3-415 applies.
